Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 6 Bond

53-6-50.
Persons required to give; determination of amount.

Unless otherwise provided in this Code section, any person who seeks to qualify to serve as the personal representative of an intestate estate or as a temporary administrator shall be required to give bond with good and sufficient security.

A national banking association or a bank or trust company organized under the laws of this state that seeks to qualify as a personal representative of an intestate estate or temporary administrator shall not be required to give bond for the faithful performance of its duties unless its combined capital, surplus, and undivided profits are less than $400,000.00 as reflected in its last statement filed with the comptroller of the currency of the United States or the commissioner of banking and finance or unless the instrument under which it seeks to qualify expressly provides that it shall give bond.

A person petitioning to qualify as a personal representative of an intestate estate may be relieved from the requirement for giving bond by the unanimous consent of the heirs of the estate. With respect to any heir who is not sui juris, consent may be given by the guardian of the individual. The personal representative of a deceased heir is authorized to consent for that heir. In no case may consent on behalf of an heir who is not sui juris be effective if the person consenting is the person petitioning to serve as personal representative.

The provisions of this Code section shall not apply to bonds described in Code Section 53-6-41 and Code Section 53-6-53.

When the assets of the estate consist only of one or more choses in action of indeterminate value and the personal representative or temporary administrator is not relieved from the requirement for giving bond by subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section, no bond shall be required under subsection (a) of this Code section until the value of any such chose in action is able to be determined by settlement or judgment, whereupon bond shall be set in an amount to be determined in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 53-6-51. If the value of any additional such chose in action subsequently is determined by settlement or judgment, the amount of the bond shall be increased in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 53-6-51. As used in this subsection, the term ‘chose in action’ shall have the same meaning as provided in Article 2 of Chapter 12 of Title 44.

A personal representative or temporary administrator who qualifies to serve without bond pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall have no authority to receive the settlement or judgment of a chose in action under this subsection until:

Such personal representative or temporary administrator has posted bond in accordance with paragraph (1) of this subsection; and

Upon the initial posting of bond by such personal representative or temporary administrator in the first instance in which the value of a chose in action is determined by settlement or judgment, amended letters have been issued accordingly.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-50

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 25; Ga. L. 2022, p. 207, § 8/HB 620.

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, added subsection (e).

Cross references.

Provisions regarding exemption of financial institutions from fiduciary bond or security requirements, §

7-1-311

.

Law reviews.

For article surveying wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 323 (1982).

53-6-51.
Requisites.

The bond of a personal representative or temporary administrator shall be secured by an individual who is a domiciliary of this state or by a licensed commercial surety authorized to transact business in this state, shall be payable to the probate court for the benefit of all concerned, shall be conditioned upon the faithful discharge of the personal representative’s or temporary administrator’s duty as such as required by law, and shall be attested by the judge of the probate court or the clerk of the probate court.

Whenever a personal representative or temporary administrator is required to give bond, the probate court may order the personal representative or temporary administrator to post such bond for a period of time greater than one year, as may be appropriate in the circumstances. A surety on the bond posted pursuant to this Code section shall not be relieved of liability merely because of the expiration of the term of the bond but shall be subject to the provisions of law for the discharge of a surety applicable to other bonds.

The bond shall be in a sum equal to double the value of the estate to be administered; provided, however, that the bond shall be in an amount equal to the value of the estate if secured by a licensed commercial surety authorized to transact business in this state. The value of the estate for purposes of the bond shall be determined without regard to the value of any real property or improvements thereon held by the personal representative or temporary administrator as fiduciary but, upon the conversion of the real property into personalty, a bond shall be given based upon the value of the estate, including the value of the personalty into which the real property was converted.

Substantial compliance with these requisites for the bond shall be deemed sufficient; and no bond shall be declared invalid by reason of any variation from these requisites as to payee, amount, or condition, where the manifest intention was to give bond as personal representative or temporary administrator and a breach of the fiduciary’s duty as such has been proved.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-51

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 26.

Law reviews.

For article surveying wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 323 (1982).

53-6-52.
Reduction.

If the value of an estate decreases, the probate court may permit a corresponding reduction in the amount of the bond, but this reduction does not affect the liability of the surety for prior waste or misconduct by the personal representative or temporary administrator.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-52

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-6-53.
Personal representative qualified to serve without, or not otherwise legally required to give, bond.

When a personal representative has qualified to serve without bond or is not otherwise required by law to give bond, the probate court, on its own motion or on the representation of any party in interest that the personal representative is mismanaging the estate, shall order the personal representative to appear and show cause as to why bond should not be given or the personal representative’s letters revoked. The order shall be served in person on the personal representative at least ten days prior to the hearing. Failure to show cause shall authorize the court to require bond or to revoke the letters or to take any other action as may be necessary under the circumstances.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-53

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-6-54.
Recordation and custody.

The clerk of the probate court shall record bonds in a book kept for that purpose and shall retain custody of the bonds.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-54

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.